Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 1 State Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-1-1 — 16-1-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, §§ 3 — 5, 9; Repealed by P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 43, effective May 7, 1988.

16-1-5.
Duties of commissioner of elementary and secondary education.

It shall be the duty of the commissioner of elementary and secondary education:

To carry out the policies and program formulated by the council on elementary and secondary education.

To evaluate credentials of applicants for certificates, to verify that the certification of teachers is in accordance with law and established standards, and to issue certificates at the direction of the board.

To certify the approval of accredited schools.

To recommend to the board an outline of the subjects and courses of study and the instructional standards for elementary and secondary schools.

To approve the distribution of state school funds in accordance with law and the regulations of the board.

To verify that school sites and school building plans are in accordance with law and regulations.

To exercise supervision over school libraries and library services.

To certify that school bus routes and schedules and all contracts for pupil transportation conform with provisions of law and the rules and regulations of the board.

To require the observance of all laws relating to schools and education.

To interpret school law and to decide such controversies as may be appealed to the commissioner from decisions of local school committees.

To prepare and recommend standard forms for the use of local schools.

To prepare, with the assistance of the department of administration, manuals of uniform budgetary and standard financial records and procedures for local school officers. The board of regents shall adopt uniform local school budgeting procedures no later than July 1, 1989, and those procedures should include, at a minimum, the following:

Provision for uniform classification of revenues and expenditures;

Requirements of detailed expenditure estimates and a table of organization including the proposed staffing of each school;

Estimates of receipts and expenditures for the last two (2) completed fiscal years, the current and ensuing fiscal years; and

To carry out the purpose of this subsection a sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) not otherwise appropriated shall be included in the appropriation made to support the department of elementary and secondary education.

To receive general supervision from the council on elementary and secondary education and to appoint the several officers and employees of the department subject to the provisions of the state merit system act, chapters 3 and 4 of title 36.

To establish health education, alcohol and substance abuse programs for students in grades kindergarten (K) through twelve (12), in accordance with §

35-4-18

. The program will consist of the following: A mandated state health education, alcohol and substance abuse curriculum for grades kindergarten (K) through twelve (12), a mandated assessment program in the areas of health, fitness, alcohol and substance abuse, and an in-service training program that will be developed specifically for the implementation of the mandated curriculum.

To appoint a three-member (3) committee for the purpose of choosing a “teacher of the year” among teachers in public school grades kindergarten (K) through twelve (12). The “teacher of the year” shall receive an award of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

It is the intent of the general assembly that the funds necessary to carry out the provisions of this subdivision shall be provided within the annual appropriations act.

To institute a process to review, revise, and adopt statewide academic standards that align with state assessments for the core subjects of mathematics, English language arts, science and technology, history and social studies, world languages, and the arts.

To institute a process for adapting, adopting, and developing curriculum frameworks for mathematics, English language arts, science and technology, history and social studies, world languages, and the arts covered by the academic standards.

To institute a process for reviewing and identifying high-quality curriculum and materials in mathematics, English language arts, and science and technology.

To prepare each year a plan for providing statewide assistance in the preparation and implementation of professional development plans.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 10; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

16-1-5

; P.L. 1986, ch. 412, § 3, P.L. 1988, ch. 394, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 7; P.L. 1993, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 404, § 11; P.L. 2004, ch. 186, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 243, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 224, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 259, § 1.

16-1-6, 16-1-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 51, §§ 9, 13; P.L. 1901, ch. 809, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 63, §§ 10, 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 65, §§ 7, 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 176, §§ 4, 5; Repealed by P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 43, effective May 7, 1988.

16-1-8.
Visits of commissioner to schools.

The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall visit, as often as practicable, every city and town in the state, for the purpose of inspecting the schools, and diffusing as widely as possible, by public addresses and personal communications with school officers, teachers, and parents, a knowledge of the defects, and of any desirable improvements, in the administration of the system and the government and instruction of the schools.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 52, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 64, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 66, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 177, § 4; P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

16-1-8

.

16-1-9.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 52, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 64, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 66, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 177, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

16-1-9

; P.L. 1963, ch. 12, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 1978, ch. 159, § 4. For present provisions see §

16-23-3

.

16-1-10.
Assumption of control of city or town schools by department — School lunch program.

The school committee of any city or town in which the taxable property is not adequate, at the average rate of taxation for public school support throughout the state, to provide with the money that may be apportioned from the general treasury an amount sufficient to provide and maintain public schools of a high standard, may at a regular meeting held before the first day of July in any year request the department of elementary and secondary education to assume the supervision, control, and management of the public schools of the city or town for the ensuing year; provided that the city or town has appropriated for the support of public schools for the year a sum equivalent to thirty cents (30¢) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of the assessed valuation of the city or town. Upon receiving the request the department, if it is satisfied that the request is warranted and that the best interests of the public schools would be served, may assume supervision, control, and management.

The department shall make available in its school lunch program low fat fortified milk with a milk fat content of one percent (1%) or less.

History of Section.

P.L. 1913, ch. 947, § 1; P.L. 1922, ch. 2234, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 67, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 192, § 10; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-1-10

; P.L. 1973, ch. 219, § 2.

16-1-11.
Powers of department after taking over city or town schools.

For the purposes of this section and §§

16-1-10

and

16-5-22

, the department of elementary and secondary education shall be subrogated to all the powers and functions of the city or town school committee, including the right to draw orders upon the city or town treasurer for the payment for the support of the public schools of the city or town of any money in the city or town treasury required by law to be accredited to the public school account. The department of elementary and secondary education may also apportion to or expend for the support of the public schools of the city or town any part of the annual appropriation for public schools provided by §

16-4-5

as shall not be apportioned for other purposes, or the whole, or any part of the annual appropriation as the general assembly shall make for the purposes of this section and §§

16-1-10

and

16-5-22

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1913, ch. 947, § 1; P.L. 1922, ch. 2234, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 67, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 192, § 10; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-1-11

.

16-1-12, 16-1-13.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, §§ 21, 24; Repealed by P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 43, effective May 7, 1988.

16-1-14.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 308, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 18, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 23, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 9, § 14, effective July 1, 2003. For present comparable provisions, see §

16-8-10.1

.

16-1-15.
Restricted receipts.

There is hereby created a restricted receipt account with the department of elementary and secondary education for the purpose of receiving and expending monies from any other sources, public or private, limited to gifts, grants, and donations. The department shall deposit any revenues from such sources into the restricted receipt account to be used for the same educational purposes that its state appropriation is used, unless otherwise limited by any agreement to use such funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 2, § 1, effective July 6, 2021.